src/linux/hunspell_en_ru_dict/ru_RU.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY '-.ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzÅàâäçèéêîïñóôöüЁАБВГДЕЖЗИЙКЛМНОПРСТУФХЦЧШЩЪЫЬЭЮЯабвгдежзийклмнопрстуфхцчшщъыьэюяё
FLAG NUMBER

PFX 1 Y 1
PFX 1 0 trans .

PFX 2 Y 49
PFX 2 0 псевдо .
PFX 2 0 ультра .
PFX 2 0 анти .
PFX 2 0 не .
PFX 2 0 без ^[и]
PFX 2 и безы [и]
PFX 2 0 небез ^[и]
PFX 2 и небезы [и]
PFX 2 0 пост .
PFX 2 0 пред .
PFX 2 0 противо .
PFX 2 0 микро .
PFX 2 0 полу .
PFX 2 0 контр .
PFX 2 0 сверх .
PFX 2 0 пере .
PFX 2 0 квази .
PFX 2 0 дез .
PFX 2 0 за .
PFX 2 0 само .
PFX 2 0 внутри .
PFX 2 0 супер .
PFX 2 0 поли .
PFX 2 0 много .
PFX 2 0 одно .
PFX 2 0 до .
PFX 2 0 пан .
PFX 2 0 пра .
PFX 2 0 архи .
PFX 2 0 де .
PFX 2 0 пара .
PFX 2 0 макро .
PFX 2 0 недо .
PFX 2 0 мета .
PFX 2 0 вне .
PFX 2 0 гипер .
PFX 2 0 разно .
PFX 2 0 экстра .
PFX 2 0 около .
PFX 2 0 мало .
PFX 2 0 низко .
PFX 2 0 дис .
PFX 2 0 бес .
PFX 2 0 мини .
PFX 2 0 гипо .
PFX 2 0 двух .
PFX 2 0 интер .
PFX 2 0 дву .
PFX 2 0 мульти .

PFX 3 Y 49
PFX 3 0 псевдо .
PFX 3 0 ультра .
PFX 3 0 анти .
PFX 3 0 не .
PFX 3 0 без ^[и]
PFX 3 и безы [и]
PFX 3 0 небез ^[и]
PFX 3 и небезы [и]
PFX 3 0 пост .
PFX 3 0 пред .
PFX 3 0 противо .
PFX 3 0 микро .
PFX 3 0 полу .
PFX 3 0 контр .
PFX 3 0 сверх .
PFX 3 0 пере .
PFX 3 0 квази .
PFX 3 0 дез .
PFX 3 0 за .
PFX 3 0 само .
PFX 3 0 внутри .
PFX 3 0 супер .
PFX 3 0 поли .
PFX 3 0 много .
PFX 3 0 одно .
PFX 3 0 до .
PFX 3 0 пан .
PFX 3 0 пра .
PFX 3 0 архи .
PFX 3 0 де .
PFX 3 0 пара .
PFX 3 0 макро .
PFX 3 0 недо .
PFX 3 0 мета .
PFX 3 0 вне .
PFX 3 0 гипер .
PFX 3 0 разно .
PFX 3 0 экстра .
PFX 3 0 около .
PFX 3 0 мало .
PFX 3 0 низко .
PFX 3 0 дис .
PFX 3 0 бес .
PFX 3 0 мини .
PFX 3 0 гипо .
PFX 3 0 двух .
PFX 3 0 интер .
PFX 3 0 дву .
PFX 3 0 мульти .

PFX 4 Y 2
PFX 4 0 re [^e]
PFX 4 0 re- e

PFX 5 Y 1
PFX 5   0     re         .

PFX 6 Y 2
PFX 6 0 de [^e]
PFX 6 0 de- e

PFX 7 Y 1
PFX 7   0     de          .

PFX 8 Y 1
PFX 8 0 dis .

PFX 9 Y 1
PFX 9   0     dis         .

PFX 10 Y 5
PFX 10 0 com [bmp]
PFX 10 0 co [aeiouh]
PFX 10 0 cor r
PFX 10 0 col l
PFX 10 0 con [^abehilmopru].

PFX 11 Y 1
PFX 11   0     con         .

PFX 12 Y 4
PFX 12 0 il l
PFX 12 0 ir r
PFX 12 0 im [bmp]
PFX 12 0 in [^blmpr]

PFX 13 Y 1
PFX 13   0     in         .

PFX 14 Y 1
PFX 14 0 pre .

PFX 15 Y 1
PFX 15   0     pro         .

PFX 16 Y 1
PFX 16 0 non- .

PFX 17 Y 1
PFX 17 0 un .

PFX 18 Y 1
PFX 18   0     un         .

PFX 19 Y 1
PFX 19 0 mis .

PFX 20 Y 1
PFX 20 0 over .

PFX 21 Y 1
PFX 21 0 out .

PFX 22 Y 2
PFX 22 0 under [^r]
PFX 22 0 under- r

REP 119
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP f gh
REP f ugh
REP gh f
REP ff ugh
REP uf ough
REP uff ough
REP k ch
REP ch k
REP dg j
REP j dg
REP w ugh
REP ness ity
REP leness ility
REP ness ivity
REP eness ity
REP og ogue
REP ck qu
REP ck que
REP eg e.g.
REP ie i.e.
REP t ght
REP ght t
REP ok OK
REP ts ce
REP ce ts
REP a ei
REP ei a
REP a ey
REP ey a
REP ai ie
REP ie ai
REP alot a_lot
REP are air
REP are ear
REP are eir
REP air are
REP air ere
REP ere air
REP ere ear
REP ere eir
REP ear are
REP ear air
REP ear ere
REP eir are
REP eir ere
REP ch te
REP te ch
REP ch ti
REP ti ch
REP ch tu
REP tu ch
REP ch s
REP s ch
REP i igh
REP igh i
REP i uy
REP uy i
REP i ee
REP ee i
REP j di
REP di j
REP j gg
REP gg j
REP j ge
REP ge j
REP s ti
REP ti s
REP s ci
REP ci s
REP k cc
REP cc k
REP k qu
REP qu k
REP kw qu
REP o eau
REP eau o
REP o ew
REP ew o
REP oo ew
REP ew oo
REP ew ui
REP ui ew
REP oo ui
REP ui oo
REP ew u
REP u ew
REP oo u
REP u oo
REP u oe
REP oe u
REP u ieu
REP ieu u
REP ue ew
REP ew ue
REP oo ieu
REP ieu oo
REP ier ear
REP ear ier
REP air ear
REP w qu
REP qu w
REP z ss
REP ss z
REP shun tion
REP shun sion
REP shun cion
REP size cise
REP е ё
REP ё e
REP тс ц
REP ц тс
REP н нн
REP нн н
REP л лл
REP лл л
REP тся ться
REP ться тся

SFX 23 Y 9
SFX 23 e ically e
SFX 23 er rically er
SFX 23 0 ically [^e]r
SFX 23 0 atically [aeiou]m
SFX 23 0 ically [^aeiou]m
SFX 23 0 tically ma
SFX 23 a ically [^m]a
SFX 23 y ically y
SFX 23 0 ically [^aemry]

SFX 24 Y 32
SFX 24 ный ный .
SFX 24 ный ного .
SFX 24 ный ному .
SFX 24 ный ного .
SFX 24 ный ный .
SFX 24 ный ным .
SFX 24 ный ном .
SFX 24 ный ная .
SFX 24 ный ной .
SFX 24 ный ной .
SFX 24 ный ную .
SFX 24 ный ной .
SFX 24 ный ною .
SFX 24 ный ной .
SFX 24 ный ное .
SFX 24 ный ного .
SFX 24 ный ному .
SFX 24 ный ное .
SFX 24 ный ным .
SFX 24 ный ном .
SFX 24 ный ные .
SFX 24 ный ных .
SFX 24 ный ным .
SFX 24 ный ных .
SFX 24 ный ные .
SFX 24 ный ными .
SFX 24 ный ных .
SFX 24 ный ен .
SFX 24 ный на .
SFX 24 ный но .
SFX 24 ный ны .
SFX 24 ный 0 .

SFX 25 Y 32
SFX 25 ный ный .
SFX 25 ный ного .
SFX 25 ный ному .
SFX 25 ный ного .
SFX 25 ный ный .
SFX 25 ный ным .
SFX 25 ный ном .
SFX 25 ный ная .
SFX 25 ный ной .
SFX 25 ный ной .
SFX 25 ный ную .
SFX 25 ный ной .
SFX 25 ный ною .
SFX 25 ный ной .
SFX 25 ный ное .
SFX 25 ный ного .
SFX 25 ный ному .
SFX 25 ный ное .
SFX 25 ный ным .
SFX 25 ный ном .
SFX 25 ный ные .
SFX 25 ный ных .
SFX 25 ный ным .
SFX 25 ный ных .
SFX 25 ный ные .
SFX 25 ный ными .
SFX 25 ный ных .
SFX 25 ный ен .
SFX 25 ный на .
SFX 25 ный но .
SFX 25 ный ны .
SFX 25 ный 0 .

SFX 26 Y 21
SFX 26 e iness [^aeiouy]e
SFX 26 0 iness [aeiouy]e
SFX 26 0 biness [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX 26 0 kiness [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 26 0 diness [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX 26 0 finess [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX 26 0 giness [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX 26 0 kiness [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX 26 0 liness [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 26 0 miness [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX 26 0 niness [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX 26 0 piness [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX 26 0 riness [^aeio][aiou]r
SFX 26 0 siness [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX 26 0 tiness [^aeio][aiou]t
SFX 26 0 viness [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX 26 0 ziness [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX 26 0 iness [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX 26 0 iness [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 26 0 iness [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 26 0 iness [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz]

SFX 27 Y 29
SFX 27 ий ий .
SFX 27 ий ого .
SFX 27 ий ому .
SFX 27 ий ого .
SFX 27 ий ий .
SFX 27 ий им .
SFX 27 ий ом .
SFX 27 ий ая .
SFX 27 ий ой .
SFX 27 ий ой .
SFX 27 ий ую .
SFX 27 ий ой .
SFX 27 ий ою .
SFX 27 ий ой .
SFX 27 ий ое .
SFX 27 ий ого .
SFX 27 ий ому .
SFX 27 ий ое .
SFX 27 ий им .
SFX 27 ий ом .
SFX 27 ий ие .
SFX 27 ий их .
SFX 27 ий им .
SFX 27 ий их .
SFX 27 ий ие .
SFX 27 ий ими .
SFX 27 ий их .
SFX 27 ий и .
SFX 27 ий на .

SFX 28 Y 29
SFX 28 ий ий .
SFX 28 ий ого .
SFX 28 ий ому .
SFX 28 ий ого .
SFX 28 ий ий .
SFX 28 ий им .
SFX 28 ий ом .
SFX 28 ий ая .
SFX 28 ий ой .
SFX 28 ий ой .
SFX 28 ий ую .
SFX 28 ий ой .
SFX 28 ий ою .
SFX 28 ий ой .
SFX 28 ий ое .
SFX 28 ий ого .
SFX 28 ий ому .
SFX 28 ий ое .
SFX 28 ий им .
SFX 28 ий ом .
SFX 28 ий ие .
SFX 28 ий их .
SFX 28 ий им .
SFX 28 ий их .
SFX 28 ий ие .
SFX 28 ий ими .
SFX 28 ий их .
SFX 28 ий и .
SFX 28 ий на .

SFX 29 Y 21
SFX 29 e ist [^aceiou]e
SFX 29 ce tist ce
SFX 29 0 ist [aeiou]e
SFX 29 y ist [^aeioubp]y
SFX 29 0 ist [aeioubp]y
SFX 29 o ist o
SFX 29 0 ists [^eoy]
SFX 29 e ists [^aceiou]e
SFX 29 ce tists ce
SFX 29 0 ists [aeiou]e
SFX 29 y ists [^aeioubp]y
SFX 29 0 ists [aeioubp]y
SFX 29 o ists o
SFX 29 0 ists [^eoy]
SFX 29 e ist's [^aceiou]e
SFX 29 ce tist's ce
SFX 29 0 ist's [aeiou]e
SFX 29 y ist's [^aeioubp]y
SFX 29 0 ist's [aeioubp]y
SFX 29 o ist's o
SFX 29 0 ist's [^eoy]

SFX 30 Y 32
SFX 30 ьный ьный .
SFX 30 ьный ьного .
SFX 30 ьный ьному .
SFX 30 ьный ьного .
SFX 30 ьный ьный .
SFX 30 ьный ьным .
SFX 30 ьный ьном .
SFX 30 ьный ьная .
SFX 30 ьный ьной .
SFX 30 ьный ьной .
SFX 30 ьный ьную .
SFX 30 ьный ьной .
SFX 30 ьный ьною .
SFX 30 ьный ьной .
SFX 30 ьный ьное .
SFX 30 ьный ьного .
SFX 30 ьный ьному .
SFX 30 ьный ьное .
SFX 30 ьный ьным .
SFX 30 ьный ьном .
SFX 30 ьный ьные .
SFX 30 ьный ьных .
SFX 30 ьный ьным .
SFX 30 ьный ьных .
SFX 30 ьный ьные .
SFX 30 ьный ьными .
SFX 30 ьный ьных .
SFX 30 ьный ен .
SFX 30 ьный ьна .
SFX 30 ьный ьно .
SFX 30 ьный ьны .
SFX 30 ьный 0 .

SFX 31 Y 32
SFX 31 ьный ьный .
SFX 31 ьный ьного .
SFX 31 ьный ьному .
SFX 31 ьный ьного .
SFX 31 ьный ьный .
SFX 31 ьный ьным .
SFX 31 ьный ьном .
SFX 31 ьный ьная .
SFX 31 ьный ьной .
SFX 31 ьный ьной .
SFX 31 ьный ьную .
SFX 31 ьный ьной .
SFX 31 ьный ьною .
SFX 31 ьный ьной .
SFX 31 ьный ьное .
SFX 31 ьный ьного .
SFX 31 ьный ьному .
SFX 31 ьный ьное .
SFX 31 ьный ьным .
SFX 31 ьный ьном .
SFX 31 ьный ьные .
SFX 31 ьный ьных .
SFX 31 ьный ьным .
SFX 31 ьный ьных .
SFX 31 ьный ьные .
SFX 31 ьный ьными .
SFX 31 ьный ьных .
SFX 31 ьный ен .
SFX 31 ьный ьна .
SFX 31 ьный ьно .
SFX 31 ьный ьны .
SFX 31 ьный 0 .

SFX 32 Y 29
SFX 32 ий ий .
SFX 32 ий его .
SFX 32 ий ему .
SFX 32 ий его .
SFX 32 ий ий .
SFX 32 ий им .
SFX 32 ий ем .
SFX 32 ий ая .
SFX 32 ий ей .
SFX 32 ий ей .
SFX 32 ий ую .
SFX 32 ий ей .
SFX 32 ий ею .
SFX 32 ий ей .
SFX 32 ий ее .
SFX 32 ий его .
SFX 32 ий ему .
SFX 32 ий ее .
SFX 32 ий им .
SFX 32 ий ем .
SFX 32 ий ие .
SFX 32 ий их .
SFX 32 ий им .
SFX 32 ий их .
SFX 32 ий ие .
SFX 32 ий ими .
SFX 32 ий их .
SFX 32 ий е .
SFX 32 ий ьна .

SFX 33 Y 29
SFX 33 ий ий .
SFX 33 ий его .
SFX 33 ий ему .
SFX 33 ий его .
SFX 33 ий ий .
SFX 33 ий им .
SFX 33 ий ем .
SFX 33 ий ая .
SFX 33 ий ей .
SFX 33 ий ей .
SFX 33 ий ую .
SFX 33 ий ей .
SFX 33 ий ею .
SFX 33 ий ей .
SFX 33 ий ее .
SFX 33 ий его .
SFX 33 ий ему .
SFX 33 ий ее .
SFX 33 ий им .
SFX 33 ий ем .
SFX 33 ий ие .
SFX 33 ий их .
SFX 33 ий им .
SFX 33 ий их .
SFX 33 ий ие .
SFX 33 ий ими .
SFX 33 ий их .
SFX 33 ий е .
SFX 33 ий ьна .

SFX 34 Y 15
SFX 34 0 swoman [bdknmt]
SFX 34 0 swoman [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 34 0 woman [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 34 0 woman [^bdklmnt]e
SFX 34 0 woman [^bdeknmt]
SFX 34 0 swomen [bdknmt]
SFX 34 0 swomen [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 34 0 women [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 34 0 women [^bdklmnt]e
SFX 34 0 women [^bdeknmt]
SFX 34 0 swoman's [bdknmt]
SFX 34 0 swoman's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 34 0 woman's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 34 0 woman's [^bdklmnt]e
SFX 34 0 woman's [^bdeknmt]

SFX 35 Y 28
SFX 35 ой ой .
SFX 35 ой ого .
SFX 35 ой ому .
SFX 35 ой ого .
SFX 35 ой ой .
SFX 35 ой ым .
SFX 35 ой ом .
SFX 35 ой ая .
SFX 35 ой ой .
SFX 35 ой ой .
SFX 35 ой ую .
SFX 35 ой ой .
SFX 35 ой ою .
SFX 35 ой ой .
SFX 35 ой ое .
SFX 35 ой ого .
SFX 35 ой ому .
SFX 35 ой ое .
SFX 35 ой ым .
SFX 35 ой ом .
SFX 35 ой ые .
SFX 35 ой ых .
SFX 35 ой ым .
SFX 35 ой ых .
SFX 35 ой ые .
SFX 35 ой ыми .
SFX 35 ой ых .
SFX 35 ой е .

SFX 36 Y 28
SFX 36 ой ой .
SFX 36 ой ого .
SFX 36 ой ому .
SFX 36 ой ого .
SFX 36 ой ой .
SFX 36 ой ым .
SFX 36 ой ом .
SFX 36 ой ая .
SFX 36 ой ой .
SFX 36 ой ой .
SFX 36 ой ую .
SFX 36 ой ой .
SFX 36 ой ою .
SFX 36 ой ой .
SFX 36 ой ое .
SFX 36 ой ого .
SFX 36 ой ому .
SFX 36 ой ое .
SFX 36 ой ым .
SFX 36 ой ом .
SFX 36 ой ые .
SFX 36 ой ых .
SFX 36 ой ым .
SFX 36 ой ых .
SFX 36 ой ые .
SFX 36 ой ыми .
SFX 36 ой ых .
SFX 36 ой е .

SFX 37 Y 3
SFX 37 y iful [^aeiou]y
SFX 37 0 ful [aeiou]y
SFX 37 0 ful [^y]

SFX 38 Y 32
SFX 38 ый ый .
SFX 38 ый ого .
SFX 38 ый ому .
SFX 38 ый ого .
SFX 38 ый ый .
SFX 38 ый ым .
SFX 38 ый ом .
SFX 38 ый ая .
SFX 38 ый ой .
SFX 38 ый ой .
SFX 38 ый ую .
SFX 38 ый ой .
SFX 38 ый ою .
SFX 38 ый ой .
SFX 38 ый ое .
SFX 38 ый ого .
SFX 38 ый ому .
SFX 38 ый ое .
SFX 38 ый ым .
SFX 38 ый ом .
SFX 38 ый ые .
SFX 38 ый ых .
SFX 38 ый ым .
SFX 38 ый ых .
SFX 38 ый ые .
SFX 38 ый ыми .
SFX 38 ый ых .
SFX 38 ый 0 .
SFX 38 ый а .
SFX 38 ый о .
SFX 38 ый ы .
SFX 38 ый  .

SFX 39 Y 32
SFX 39 ый ый .
SFX 39 ый ого .
SFX 39 ый ому .
SFX 39 ый ого .
SFX 39 ый ый .
SFX 39 ый ым .
SFX 39 ый ом .
SFX 39 ый ая .
SFX 39 ый ой .
SFX 39 ый ой .
SFX 39 ый ую .
SFX 39 ый ой .
SFX 39 ый ою .
SFX 39 ый ой .
SFX 39 ый ое .
SFX 39 ый ого .
SFX 39 ый ому .
SFX 39 ый ое .
SFX 39 ый ым .
SFX 39 ый ом .
SFX 39 ый ые .
SFX 39 ый ых .
SFX 39 ый ым .
SFX 39 ый ых .
SFX 39 ый ые .
SFX 39 ый ыми .
SFX 39 ый ых .
SFX 39 ый 0 .
SFX 39 ый а .
SFX 39 ый о .
SFX 39 ый ы .
SFX 39 ый  .

SFX 40 Y 9
SFX 40 e able [acegilou]e
SFX 40 0 able [^acegilou]e
SFX 40 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 40 0 lable [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 40 0 able [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX 40 0 able [^aeiou][cl]
SFX 40 y iable [^aeiou]y
SFX 40 0 able [aeiou]y
SFX 40 0 able [^cely]
